Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.28
Lead-based paint hazard, defined.

Lead-based paint hazard means any condition that causes exposure to lead from lead-contaminated dust, lead-contaminated soil, or lead-contaminated paint that is deteriorated paint or is present in accessible surfaces, friction surfaces, or impact surfaces that would result in adverse human health effects as identified by the department.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 658.